Hawaii statutes.
[§673-6] Award or judgment as bar. An
award or judgment in an action under this chapter shall constitute a complete
bar to any action by the claimant, by reason of the same subject matter,
against the agent, officer, or employee of the State whose act or omission gave
rise to the claim. [L 1988, c 395, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next